Virginia statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Chapter 2. Common Law, Statutes and Rules of Construction.

§§ 1-10 through 1-17.2.

Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 10, effective October 1, 2005.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 839, recodified Chapters 2 and 3 of Title 1, and all of Title 7.1, as Chapters 2.1 through 5 of Title 1, effective October 1, 2005. In addition to revision by Acts 2005, c. 839,

Titles 1

and 7.1 were also amended by other acts passed at the 2005 Session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated the majority of these amendments into the new sections. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Former § 1-13.4 was repealed by Acts 1986, c. 155. Former § 1-13.11 was repealed by Acts 1981, c. 228. Former § 1-13.39 was repealed by Acts 1983, c. 260. Former § 1-14 was repealed by Acts 1975, c. 547.